Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2318
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the testing, control, and eradication of diseases, including, but not limited to, chronic wasting disease, brucellosis, and tuberculosis in domesticated cervine animal herds in the state. The rules and regulations may include, but are not limited to, provisions governing:

(1) Testing, test results, and test subjects;

(2) Intrastate change of ownership, including provisions requiring all domesticated cervine breeding animals to be tested or originate from a herd which is in a herd certification program as established by the department under section 54-2319; and

(3) Any other issues deemed necessary by the department to effectively control and eradicate diseases.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 17.